Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-908
Act, how cited.

Sections
8-908 to 8-918 shall be known and may
be cited as the Nebraska Bank Holding Company Act of 1995.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 19;

Laws 2010, LB890, § 10.